Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3600.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin LOCAL ACTIONS TO ESTABLISH COMMUNITY LAND TRUSTS.new text end new text begin (a) Where practicable, the commissioner of the Housing Finance Agency may award an additional point or points, not exceeding five percent of the total available points in a given competitive development program, to a proposal in a competitive capital development program if the proposed project is located in a city or a township that contains property qualifying as class 4d(2) as provided in Minnesota Statutes, section 273.13, subdivision 25, paragraph (e). new text end new text begin (b) This section expires on December 31, 2030. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to selection criteria and scoring systems developed on or after that day. new text end